test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-possessives_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - дю̄: # vowel
    дю̄+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:     дю̄в
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxSg1: дю̄вав
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxSg1: дю̄яв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:     дю̄дӯв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1:     дю̄ла̄в
    дю̄+N+Sg+All+PxSg1:     дю̄ткӣв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1:     дю̄лӣв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1:     дю̄кла̄в
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dir+PxSg1:     дю̄клӣв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1:     дю̄дукив
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:     дю̄гидив
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1:     дю̄див
    дю̄+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1:     дю̄нунми

    дю̄+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:     дю̄с
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxSg2: дю̄вас
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxSg2: дю̄яс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2:     дю̄дӯс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2:     дю̄ла̄с
    дю̄+N+Sg+All+PxSg2:     дю̄ткӣс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2:     дю̄лӣс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2:     дю̄кла̄с
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dir+PxSg2:     дю̄клӣс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2:     дю̄дукис
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2:     дю̄гидис
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2:     дю̄дис
    дю̄+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:     дю̄нунис

    дю̄+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:     дю̄н
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxSg3: дю̄ван
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxSg3: дю̄ян
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:     дю̄дӯн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:     дю̄ла̄н
    дю̄+N+Sg+All+PxSg3:     дю̄ткӣн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3:     дю̄лӣн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3:     дю̄кла̄н
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dir+PxSg3:     дю̄клӣн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3:     дю̄дукин
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3:     дю̄гидин
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3:     дю̄дин
    дю̄+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3:     дю̄нунин

    дю̄+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:     дю̄в
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxPl1: дю̄вав
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxPl1: дю̄яв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1:     дю̄дӯв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1:     дю̄ла̄в
    дю̄+N+Sg+All+PxPl1:     дю̄ткӣв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1:     дю̄лӣв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1:     дю̄кла̄в
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dir+PxPl1:     дю̄клӣв
    дю̄+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1:     дю̄дукив
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1:     дю̄гидив
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1:     дю̄див
    дю̄+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1:     дю̄нунми

    дю̄+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:     дю̄с
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxPl2: дю̄вас
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxPl2: дю̄яс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2:     дю̄дӯс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2:     дю̄ла̄с
    дю̄+N+Sg+All+PxPl2:     дю̄ткӣс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2:     дю̄лӣс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2:     дю̄кла̄с
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dir+PxPl2:     дю̄клӣс
    дю̄+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2:     дю̄дукис
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2:     дю̄гидис
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2:     дю̄дис
    дю̄+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2:     дю̄нунис

    дю̄+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:     дю̄н
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxPl3: дю̄ван
    дю̄+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxPl3: дю̄ян
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3:     дю̄дӯн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3:     дю̄ла̄н
    дю̄+N+Sg+All+PxPl3:     дю̄ткӣн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3:     дю̄лӣн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3:     дю̄кла̄н
    дю̄+N+Sg+Dir+PxPl3:     дю̄клӣн
    дю̄+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3:     дю̄дукин
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:     дю̄гидин
    дю̄+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3:     дю̄дин
    дю̄+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3:     дю̄нунин





  Noun - бэр: # consonant
    бэр+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:     бэрвэ
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxSg1: бэрвав
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxSg1: бэряв
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:     бэрдӯв
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1:     бэрла̄в
    бэр+N+Sg+All+PxSg1:     бэрткӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1:     бэрлӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1:     бэркла̄в
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir+PxSg1:     бэрклӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1:     бэрдукив
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:     бэргидив
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1:     бэрдив
    бэр+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1:     бэрнунми

    бэр+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:     бэрсэ
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxSg2: бэрвас
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxSg2: бэряс
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2:     бэрдӯс
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2:     бэрла̄с
    бэр+N+Sg+All+PxSg2:     бэрткӣс
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2:     бэрлӣс
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2:     бэркла̄с
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir+PxSg2:     бэрклӣс
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2:     бэрдукис
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2:     бэргидис
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2:     бэрдис
    бэр+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:     бэрнунис

    бэр+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:     бэрнэ
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxSg3: бэрван
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxSg3: бэрян
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:     бэрдӯн
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:     бэрла̄н
    бэр+N+Sg+All+PxSg3:     бэрткӣн
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3:     бэрлӣн
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3:     бэркла̄н
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir+PxSg3:     бэрклӣн
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3:     бэрдукин
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3:     бэргидин
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3:     бэрдин
    бэр+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3:     бэрнунин

    бэр+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:     бэрвун
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxPl1: бэрвав
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxPl1: бэряв
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1:     бэрдӯв
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1:     бэрла̄в
    бэр+N+Sg+All+PxPl1:     бэрткӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1:     бэрлӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1:     бэркла̄в
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir+PxPl1:     бэрклӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1:     бэрдукив
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1:     бэргидив
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1:     бэрдив
    бэр+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1:     бэрнунми

    бэр+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl12:     бэрвун
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxPl12: бэрвав
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxPl12: бэряв
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl12:     бэрдӯв
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl12:     бэрла̄в
    бэр+N+Sg+All+PxPl12:     бэрткӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl12:     бэрлӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl12:     бэркла̄в
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir+PxPl12:     бэрклӣв
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl12:     бэрдукив
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl12:     бэргидив
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl12:     бэрдив
    бэр+N+Sg+Com+PxPl12:     бэрнунми

    бэр+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:     бэрсун
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxPl2: бэрвас
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxPl2: бэряс
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2:     бэрдӯс
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2:     бэрла̄с
    бэр+N+Sg+All+PxPl2:     бэрткӣс
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2:     бэрлӣс
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2:     бэркла̄с
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir+PxPl2:     бэрклӣс
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2:     бэрдукис
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2:     бэргидис
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2:     бэрдис
    бэр+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2:     бэрнунис

    бэр+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:     бэртын
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Def+PxPl3: бэрватын
    бэр+N+Sg+Acc+Ind+PxPl3: бэрятын
    бэр+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3:     бэрдӯтын
    бэр+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3:     бэрла̄тын
    бэр+N+Sg+All+PxPl3:     бэрткӣтын
    бэр+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3:     бэрлӣтын
    бэр+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3:     бэркла̄тын
    бэр+N+Sg+Dir+PxPl3:     бэрклӣтын
    бэр+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3:     бэрдукитын
    бэр+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:     бэргидитын
    бэр+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3:     бэрдитын
    бэр+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3:     бэрнунитын
